Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 620 Dependency, Neglect, and Abuse
620.290.
Board’s findings and recommendations — Report on children frequently moved.

The local citizen foster care review board shall submit to the court within fourteen (14) days of the six (6) month review its findings and recommendations. The findings and recommendations for each child under review shall include but need not be limited to:

Whether there is a plan for permanence;

Whether the plan is progressing;

The appropriateness of the current placement or plan for permanence. If the local foster care review board determines that a current placement or plan for permanence is inappropriate, a notification shall be provided to the court, and the cabinet which shall summarize the position of the local foster care review board, the response of the cabinet, if any, to the concerns expressed by the local foster care review board, and any action proposed by the local foster care review board; and

The number of moves that have occurred during the child’s placement into out-of-home care, including whether the child has moved three (3) or more times within a six (6) month period.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 90, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 301, § 13, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 398, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 24, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 132, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

620.300.
Notice of completed reviews. [Repealed.]

620.310.
State Citizen Foster Care Review Board established.

There is hereby established a State Citizen Foster Care Review Board. The State Citizen Foster Care Review Board shall consist of all chairmen of the local foster care review boards.

The State Citizen Foster Care Review Board shall biennially elect a chairman and vice chairman to serve in the absence of the chairman.

The State Citizen Foster Care Review Board shall meet at least annually, and more frequently upon the call of the chairman, or as the board shall determine.

Members of the State Citizen Foster Care Review Board may only receive compensation for travel mileage cost and overnight lodging at a rate consistent with that provided to state employees as provided under the law of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 92, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 301, § 14, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 25, effective July 14, 2018.

620.320.
Duties of State Citizen Foster Care Review Board. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The duties of the State Citizen Foster Care Review Board shall be to:

Establish, approve, and provide training programs for local citizen foster care review board members;

Review and coordinate the activities of local citizen foster care review boards;

Establish reporting procedures to be followed by the local citizen foster care review boards and publish an annual written report compiling data reported by local foster care review boards which shall include statistics relating, at a minimum, to the following:

Barriers to permanency identified in reviews;

The number of children moved more than three (3) times within a six (6) month period;

The average length of time in care;

Local solutions reported to meet identified barriers; and

The total number and frequency of reviews;

Publish an annual written report on the effectiveness of such local citizen foster care review boards; and

Evaluate and make annual recommendations to the Supreme Court, Governor, and the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee established in KRS

6.943

regarding:

Laws of the Commonwealth;

Practices, policies, and procedures within the Commonwealth affecting permanence for children in out-of-home placement and the investigation of allegations of abuse and neglect;

The findings of the local citizen foster care review board community forums conducted pursuant to KRS

620.270

; and

The effectiveness or lack thereof and reasons therefor of local citizen foster care review of children in the custody of the cabinet in bringing about permanence for the Commonwealth’s children.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 93, effective July 1, 1987; 1992, ch. 412, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 301, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 398, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 56, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 132, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

620.320.
Duties of State Citizen Foster Care Review Board. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The duties of the State Citizen Foster Care Review Board shall be to:

Establish, approve, and provide training programs for local citizen foster care review board members;

Review and coordinate the activities of local citizen foster care review boards;

Establish reporting procedures to be followed by the local citizen foster care review boards and publish an annual written report compiling data reported by local foster care review boards which shall include statistics relating, at a minimum, to the following:

Barriers to permanency identified in reviews;

The number of children moved more than three (3) times within a six (6) month period;

The average length of time in care;

Local solutions reported to meet identified barriers; and

The total number and frequency of reviews;

Publish an annual written report on the effectiveness of such local citizen foster care review boards; and

Evaluate and make annual recommendations to the Supreme Court, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Governor regarding:

Laws of the Commonwealth;

Practices, policies, and procedures within the Commonwealth affecting permanence for children in out-of-home placement and the investigation of allegations of abuse and neglect;

The findings of the local citizen foster care review board community forums conducted pursuant to KRS

620.270

; and

The effectiveness or lack thereof and reasons therefor of local citizen foster care review of children in the custody of the cabinet in bringing about permanence for the Commonwealth’s children.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 93, effective July 1, 1987; 1992, ch. 412, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 301, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 398, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 56, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 132, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 211, § 31, effective January 1, 2023; 2022 ch. 223, § 15, effective January 1, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2023). This statute was amended by
2022 Ky. Acts chs. 211 and
223, which are identical and have been codified together.

620.330.
Support services for State Citizen Foster Care Review Board.

Secretarial and support services for the State Citizen Foster Care Review Board may be provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

The State Citizen Foster Care Review Board may receive state and federal funds to insure total or partial funding of the board’s activities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 94, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 301, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 16, effective July 15, 1998.

620.340.
Reports from local boards to state board.

Each local citizen foster care review board shall forward annually to the State Citizen Foster Care Review Board a report and any recommendations regarding:

The policies and practices of the cabinet, the court, and other child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies which affect permanence for children in out-of-home placement; and

The process of local citizen foster care review.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 95, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 301, § 17, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 17, effective July 15, 1998.

620.345.
Study group on privatizing foster care services — Membership — Recommendations. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023]

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires;

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

The secretary shall designate a study group to make recommendations regarding the feasibility and implementation of the privatization of all foster care services in the Commonwealth.

The study group shall be composed of the following members:

The secretary;

The commissioner for the Department for Community Based Services;

The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or designee;

The executive director of the Governor’s Office of Early Childhood, or designee;

One (1) adult who was a former foster child in the Commonwealth;

One (1) adult who is a current or former foster parent in the Commonwealth;

Two (2) employees of a licensed child-placing agency;

Two (2) employees of a licensed child-caring facility; and

Any personnel within the Department for Community Based Services that the secretary deems necessary.

In its deliberations, the study group shall include but not be limited to analysis of improved timeliness and likelihood of permanency such as reunification, adoption, or guardianship; fewer moves for children in foster care; reduced instances of reentry into care; and financial implications.

The study group shall report its recommendations by July 1, 2019, to the Governor, the Interim Joint Committees on Appropriations and Revenue and Health and Welfare and Family Services, and the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee established in KRS

6.943

. The study group shall cease to operate after the delivery of the recommendations required by this subsection.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 46, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2023).
Under KRS

446.260

, the repeal of this statute in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 211 prevails over its amendment in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 223.

620.345.
Study group on privatizing foster care services — Membership — Recommendations. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023; Effective until January 1, 2023]

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 46, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 223, § 16, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by 2022 ch. 211, § 41, effective January 1, 2023.

620.350.
Abandoned newborn infant — Emergency custody order — No investigation of abandonment — Placement in foster home — Inquiry to ensure that infant is not missing child — Involuntary termination of parental rights.

As used in this section, “newborn infant” means an infant who is medically determined to be less than thirty (30) days old.

Upon notice from any emergency medical services provider or hospital staff that a newborn infant has been abandoned at a hospital, the cabinet shall immediately seek an order for emergency custody of the infant.

No child protective services investigation or assessment shall be initiated regarding the abandonment of an infant in accordance with KRS

405.075

. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply when indicators of child physical abuse or child neglect are present.

Upon the infant’s release from the hospital, the cabinet shall place the child in a foster home approved by the cabinet to provide concurrent planning placement services. As used in this paragraph, “concurrent planning placement services” means the foster family shall work with the cabinet on reunification with the birth family, if known, and shall seek to adopt the infant if reunification cannot be accomplished.

At the temporary removal hearing required by KRS

620.080

, if the court places temporary custody with the cabinet, the custody order shall remain in effect for a minimum of thirty (30) days.

During the initial thirty (30) days of placement, the cabinet shall request assistance from law enforcement officials to investigate through the Missing Child Information Center established by KRS

17.450

and other national resources to ensure that the infant is not a missing child.

As soon as practicable following the thirty (30) day placement period, the cabinet shall file a petition in Circuit Court seeking the involuntary termination of parental rights of the unknown parents and authority to place the child for adoption in accordance with KRS Chapter 625.

If a claim of parental rights is made at any time prior to the court order issued under KRS

625.100

, the Circuit Court may hold the action for involuntary termination of parental rights in abeyance for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days and immediately remand the case to the District Court.

If a case is remanded to District Court under this subsection, an adjudicatory hearing shall be conducted as required by KRS

620.100

within ten (10) days of the assertion of parental rights;

The District Court may order genetic testing to establish maternity or paternity at the expense of the claimant;

The cabinet shall conduct a child protective services investigation or assessment and home evaluation to develop recommendations for the District Court; and

Further proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 620; however, a newborn infant who has been placed in accordance with KRS

405.075

shall not be found to be a neglected child based on that act alone.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 303, § 5, effective April 9, 2002; 2016 ch. 122, § 6, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2002). In subsection (1) of this section, the words “means an infant” have been inserted by the Reviser of Statutes to correct a manifest clerical or typographical error in accordance with
KRS

7.136

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note: Remembering the Endangered “Child”: Limiting the Definition of “Safe Haven” and Looking Beyond the Safe Haven Law Framework, 98 Ky. L.J. 833 (2009/2010).

620.355.
Information form for person who leaves infant — Media campaign.

The cabinet shall make available standardized health, medical, and background information forms for use in gathering voluntary, nonidentifying information from a person who leaves an infant in accordance with KRS

405.075

and as required by KRS

216B.190

. The materials shall clearly state on each page that the information requested is designed to facilitate medical care for the infant. The material shall include information on family services, termination of parental rights, and adoption. The material shall also include:

Information on the importance of medical and health information regarding the infant; and

Written notification that failure to contact the Department for Community Based Services and assert a claim of parental rights within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the material shall result in the commencement of proceedings for involuntary termination of parental rights and placement of the child for adoption.

Subject to available funding, the cabinet shall produce and distribute a media campaign to promote safe placement alternatives for newborn infants, the confidentiality offered to birth parents, and information regarding adoption procedures.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 303, § 6, effective April 9, 2002; 2016 ch. 122, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note: Remembering the Endangered “Child”: Limiting the Definition of “Safe Haven” and Looking Beyond the Safe Haven Law Framework, 98 Ky. L.J. 833 (2009/2010).

620.360.
Rights and responsibilities of foster parents — Training of person investigating abuse or neglect in foster homes — Foster parent approval — Nonliability of cabinet.

Persons who provide foster care services to children who have been committed to the custody of the state shall be considered a primary partner and member of a professional team caring for foster children. Foster parents shall have the following rights:

To be treated with respect, consideration, and dignity;

To fully understand the role of the cabinet and the role of other members of the child’s professional team;

To receive information and training about foster parents’ rights, responsibilities, and access to local and statewide support groups, including but not limited to the Kentucky Foster/Adoptive Care Association, the Kentucky Foster and Adoptive Parent Network, and Adoption Support of Kentucky;

To receive information and training to improve skills in the daily care and in meeting the special needs of foster children;

To receive timely and adequate financial reimbursement for knowledgeable and quality care of a child in foster care within budgetary limitations;

To maintain the foster family’s own routines and values while respecting the rights and confidentiality of each foster child placed in their home;

To receive a period of respite from providing foster care, pursuant to cabinet policies;

To receive, upon an open records request, a copy of all information contained in the cabinet’s records about the family’s foster home and the foster care services provided by the family consistent with KRS

605.160

;

To access cabinet support and assistance as necessary twenty-four (24) hours per day, seven (7) days per week;

To receive, prior to a child being placed in the foster home pursuant to KRS

605.090

, information relating to the child’s behavior, family background, or health history that may jeopardize the health or safety of any member of the foster family’s household, including other foster children, and similar information that may affect the manner in which foster care services are provided, consistent with KRS

605.160

. In an emergency situation, the cabinet shall provide information as soon as it is available;

To refuse placement of a child within the foster home and to request, with reasonable notice to the cabinet, the removal of a child from the foster home without fear of reprisal;

To communicate, with an appropriate release of information consistent with KRS 605.160, with other professionals who work directly with the foster child, including but not limited to teachers, therapists, and health care practitioners and to notify the cabinet within twenty-four (24) hours of the communication;

To assist the cabinet in the development of the child’s plan of care;

To receive an explanatory notice from the cabinet, consistent with KRS

620.130

and when it is in the best interest of the child, when a foster child’s case plan has changed and, except in an immediate response to a child protective services investigation involving the foster home, an explanatory notice of termination or change in placement affecting the foster home within fourteen (14) days of the change or termination in placement;

To have priority consideration for placement if a child who has previously been placed in the foster home reenters foster care, consistent with KRS

605.130

and

620.130

and to the extent it is in the best interest of the child;

To have priority consideration for adoption if a foster child who has been placed in the foster home for a period of at least twelve (12) consecutive months becomes eligible for adoption consistent with KRS

605.130

and 620.130 and to the extent it is in the best interest of the child;

To maintain contact with the foster child after the child leaves the foster home, unless the child, a biological parent, the cabinet when the cabinet retains custody of the child, or other foster or adoptive parent refuses such contact; and

To receive notice of, have a right to attend, and have a right to be heard in, either verbally or in writing, any cabinet or court proceeding held with respect to the child currently placed in their care, provided the cabinet has no concerns related to maltreatment of the child while in the foster parent’s care. The notice required by this paragraph shall be provided to the foster parent by an attorney for the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. This paragraph shall not be construed to require that a foster parent caring for the child be made a party to a proceeding solely on the basis of the notice and rights to attend and be heard.

The responsibilities of foster parents shall include but not be limited to the following:

To maintain an orderly and clean home;

To ensure that the child has adequate resources for personal hygiene and clothing;

To provide recreational and spiritual opportunities for the child, in accordance with cabinet policies;

To attend all school and case planning meetings involving a foster child placed in their home whenever possible, subject to KRS

620.130

and the confidentiality requirements of 42

U.S.C. sec. 671

;

To abide by cabinet policies relating to discipline of a foster child; and

To support the involvement of a foster child’s biological family whenever possible and in accordance with cabinet policies.

The cabinet shall provide specific training on investigations of alleged child abuse or neglect in a foster home to a person appointed by the Kentucky Foster/Adoptive Care Association. The training shall include the rights of a foster parent during an investigation. Training shall be consistent with 42

U.S.C. sec. 5106(a)

.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish that foster parent approval shall be effective for a minimum of three (3) years before reevaluation is required.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to establish monetary liability of or cause of action against the cabinet.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 45, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2018 ch. 159, § 45, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 132, § 4, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 180, § 3, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 182, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

620.363.
Rights of foster child.

A child who is placed in foster care shall be considered a primary partner and member of a professional team. A foster child, as the most integral part of the professional team, shall have the following rights to:

Adequate food, clothing, and shelter;

Freedom from physical, sexual, or emotional injury or exploitation;

Develop physically, mentally, and emotionally to his or her potential;

A safe, secure, and stable family;

Individual educational needs being met;

Remain in the same educational setting prior to removal, whenever possible;

Placement in the least restrictive setting in close proximity to his or her home that meets his or her needs and serves his or her best interests to the extent that such placement is available;

Information about the circumstances requiring his or her initial and continued placement;

Receive notice of, attend, and be consulted in the development of case plans during periodic reviews;

Receive notice of and participate in court hearings;

Receive notice of and explanation for changes in placement or visitation agreements;

Visit the family in the family home, receive visits from family and friends, and have telephone conversations with family members, when not contraindicated by the case plan or court order;

Participate in extracurricular, social, cultural, and enrichment activities, including but not limited to sports, field trips, and overnights;

Express opinions on issues concerning his or her placement, care, or treatment;

Three (3) additional rights if he or she is age fourteen (14) years or older. These additional three (3) rights are the right to:

Designate two (2) additional individuals to participate in case planning conferences or periodic reviews, who are not the foster parent or his or her worker, and who may advocate on his or her behalf. The cabinet, child-caring facility, or child-placing agency may reject an individual with reasonable belief that the individual will not act appropriately on the child’s behalf;

Receive a written description of the programs and services that will help prepare him or her for the transition from foster care to successful adulthood; and

Receive a consumer report yearly until discharged from care and to receive assistance in interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies in the report, pursuant to 42

U.S.C. sec. 675(5)

(I);

Receive, free of charge when he or she is eighteen (18) years or older and preparing to exit foster care by reason of attaining the age of eighteen (18) years old, the following:

An official birth certificate;

A Social Security card;

Health insurance information;

A state-issued identification; and

A copy of the child’s cabinet case history, including:

Family medical history;

Placement history records; and

The child’s medical records, including physical, dental, vision, and mental health records;

Request placement be made where he or she feels the most safe and accepted;

Participate in a sibling or half-sibling’s court hearing if deemed appropriate by the cabinet, court of jurisdiction, and guardian ad litem, if applicable; and

Raise his or her child and make decisions on behalf of his or her child unless a health or safety risk is determined by the cabinet or due to the treatment needs of the youth.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 33, § 7, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 75, § 20, effective April 1, 2022.

620.365.
Notification when child in foster care is to be moved or reunified with family.

If the cabinet determines that a child, who is in the custody of the cabinet through an emergency, temporary, or permanent court order as a result of dependency, neglect, or abuse and is in foster care, should be moved from a current placement to a new placement or reunified with their family, the cabinet shall provide verbal and written notification to the foster parents and the child-caring facility or child-placing agency where the child is residing at least ten (10) calendar days prior to the new placement or reunification occurring.

The cabinet’s mandate to provide the notification required by this section shall not be required if the cabinet determines the child is in imminent danger.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 16, effective July 14, 2018.